Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-1303. Acts 1999, No. 1353, § 15; 2001, No. 1740, § 3.

For current law, see the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, §12-12-901 et seq.

ALR.

Construction and Application of State Statutory Provisions Prohibiting Racial Profiling. 102 A.L.R.6th 621 (2015).

ALR.

Racial Profiling by Law Enforcement Officers in Connection with Traffic Stops as Infringement of Federal Constitutional Rights or Federal Civil Rights Statutes.91 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 1 (2015).

Police officer engaged in racial profiling prohibited by state statute, the state constitution, the U.S. Constitution, and the city's written policy and the officer also illegally seized one of the plaintiffs, thereby violating U.S. Const., Amend. IV and the state constitution; the police chief, who supervised the officer and ran the police department, was deliberately indifferent to ongoing and systemic racial profiling of which he was aware and municipal liability was imposed on the city as it permitted the officer to establish and to carry out a custom and practice of engaging in racial profiling. The officer's true objective was not to enforce traffic laws prohibiting people from driving with their vision obstructed or other minor infractions; rather, the neutral traffic laws were used as a pretext for harassing Hispanics (whether here legally or illegally), for obtaining money through fines and towing charges for the financially troubled city, and to provide an incentive for Hispanics to move out of the area—clearly illegitimate objectives.Giron v. City of Alexander, 693 F. Supp. 2d 904 (E.D. Ark. 2010).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a).

Police officer engaged in racial profiling prohibited by state statute, the state constitution, the U.S. Constitution, and the city's written policy and the officer also illegally seized one of the plaintiffs, thereby violating U.S. Const., Amend. IV and the state constitution; the police chief, who supervised the officer and ran the police department, was deliberately indifferent to ongoing and systemic racial profiling of which he was aware and municipal liability was imposed on the city as it permitted the officer to establish and to carry out a custom and practice of engaging in racial profiling. The officer's true objective was not to enforce traffic laws prohibiting people from driving with their vision obstructed or other minor infractions; rather, the neutral traffic laws were used as a pretext for harassing Hispanics (whether here legally or illegally), for obtaining money through fines and towing charges for the financially troubled city, and to provide an incentive for Hispanics to move out of the area—clearly illegitimate objectives.Giron v. City of Alexander, 693 F. Supp. 2d 904 (E.D. Ark. 2010).

Requires law enforcement officers to identify themselves by full name and jurisdiction and state the reason for the stop and when possible present written identification;

Provides for a systematic review process by supervising personnel within a department or law enforcement agency for investigating allegations of racial profiling to determine whether any officers of the law enforcement agency have a pattern of stopping or searching persons, and if the review reveals a pattern, requires an investigation to determine whether a trend is present indicating that an officer may be using race, ethnicity, national origin, or religion as a basis for investigating other violations of criminal law;

When a supervisor or other reviewer has detected a pattern of racial profiling, provides timely assistance, remediation, or discipline for individual law enforcement officers who have been found to be profiling by race, ethnicity, national origin, or religion;

Ensures that supervisors will not retaliate against officers who report racial profiling by others; and

Provides standards for the use of in-car audio and visual equipment, including the duration for which the recordings are preserved.

Each law enforcement agency may promote public awareness of the law enforcement agency's efforts to comply with the mandates of this section.

In addition, each law enforcement agency shall make available for public inspection a copy of the law enforcement agency's policy.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 2003, No. 1207, § 3, subsection (a) of this section began:

“Not later than January 1, 2004.”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added (b).

The 2007 amendment added (b)(2) and (3) and made related changes; and added (c).

The 2009 amendment, in (b)(3),inserted “law enforcement agency’s” in three places and made a stylistic change.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in the introductory language of (a).

Cited: Giron v. City of Alexander, 693 F. Supp. 2d 904 (E.D. Ark. 2010).

Includes foreign language instruction, if possible, to ensure adequate communication with residents of a community.

The commission shall promulgate rules that set significant standards for all training required in this section.

The commission may make additions, amendments, changes, or alterations to the rules in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The commission may review and recommend changes to the racial profiling policy of any law enforcement agency.

Upon request, the racial profiling policy of any law enforcement agency shall be made available to the commission for the purpose described in subdivision (d)(3) of this section.

The commission may establish a toll-free hotline and an email address to receive complaints concerning racial profiling.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added (c) and (d).

The 2011 amendment deleted former (c)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2017 amendment, in (d)(1), substituted “The commission” for “By January 1, 2006, the commission” and “rules that set” for “rules that will set”.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted “and the Task Force on Racial Profiling” at the end of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 12: May 13, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the dissemination of complete, accurate, and timely criminal history information is necessary for the protection of the people of the State of Arkansas and this act is needed to provide that necessary access to the criminal history information. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1573, § 6: Apr. 5, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the dissemination of complete, accurate, and timely criminal history information is necessary for the protection of the people of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is needed to provide necessary access to criminal history information. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1941, § 2: Apr. 11, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that exclusion of persons who are registered sex offenders or are required to register as a sex offender from certain employment or licensure is necessary for the protection of children, elderly, and developmentally disabled persons of the State of Arkansas; that this act will allow the disqualification of registered sex offenders or persons required to register as a sex offender from certain employment or licensure; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to allow state agencies and other entities to disqualify a registered sex offender or person required to register as a sex offender from licensing or employment. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 1185, § 9: Jan. 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1250, § 2; 2005, No. 1962, § 44; 2011, No. 570, § 72; 2015, No. 1265, § 4; 2017, No. 429, § 2.

Subchapter 13

— Sex Offenders Assessment

12-12-1301 — 12-12-1303. [Repealed.]

12-12-1401. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, “racial profiling” means the practice of a law enforcement officer's relying to any degree on race, ethnicity, national origin, or religion in selecting which individuals to subject to routine investigatory activities or in deciding upon the scope and substance of law enforcement activity following the initial routine investigatory activity.

“Racial profiling” does not include reliance on the criteria in combination with other identifying factors when the law enforcement officer is seeking to apprehend a specific suspect whose race, ethnicity, or national origin is part of the description of the suspect and the description is thought to be reliable and locally relevant.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1207, § 1.

12-12-1402. Prohibition on racial profiling.

No member of the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation, a county sheriff's department, or a municipal police department, constable, or any other law enforcement officer of this state shall engage in racial profiling.

The statements of policy and definitions contained in this subchapter shall not be construed or interpreted to be contrary to the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure or the United States Constitution or the Arkansas Constitution.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1207, § 2; 2005, No. 2136, § 3; 2017, No. 707, § 16.

12-12-1403. Policies.

The Division of Arkansas State Police, the Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation, all county sheriffs' departments, municipal police departments, constables, and all other law enforcement agencies of this state shall adopt a written policy that:

Prohibits racial profiling as defined in §12-12-1401;

Requires that law enforcement officers have reasonable suspicion prior to a stop, arrest, or detention;

Defines reasonable suspicion to ensure that individuals are stopped for valid reasons and that race, ethnicity, national origin, or religion is not the basis for stops for violations for which nongroup members would not be stopped;

(1)Each law enforcement agency shall include a copy of the law enforcement agency's policy in the annual report that the law enforcement agency submits to Arkansas Legislative Audit.

Arkansas Legislative Audit shall submit to the Attorney General the name of any law enforcement agency that fails to comply with subdivision (b)(1) of this section, and the Attorney General shall take such action as may be necessary to enforce this section.

Arkansas Legislative Audit shall forward to the Attorney General a copy of each law enforcement agency's policy received by Arkansas Legislative Audit. The Attorney General shall review each law enforcement agency's policy to ensure that the law enforcement agency's policy meets the standards required by law.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1207, § 3; 2005, No. 2136, § 4; 2007, No. 1048, § 2; 2009, No. 165, § 8; 2017, No. 707, § 17.

12-12-1404. Training.

Each law enforcement agency shall provide annual training to all officers that:

Emphasizes the prohibition against racial profiling;

Ensures that operating procedures adequately implement the prohibition against racial profiling and that the law enforcement agency's law enforcement personnel have copies of, understand, and follow the operating procedures; and

The course or courses of instruction and the guidelines shall stress understanding and respect for racial, ethnic, national, religious, and cultural differences and development of effective and appropriate methods of carrying out law enforcement duties.

(1)The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall adopt an initial training module concerning diversity and racial sensitivity for recruits and officers.

The commission shall also adopt a training module for biennial recertification for all recruits and officers who have completed the initial training module.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1207, § 4; 2005, No. 2136, § 5; 2011, No. 779, § 11; 2017, No. 250, § 6.

12-12-1405. Racial profiling hotline.

(1)The Attorney General shall establish and publish procedures to receive complaints concerning racial profiling.

The procedures shall include the operation of a toll-free hotline and may include procedures to receive written complaints through the mail, email, or facsimile.

The Attorney General shall maintain statewide statistics on complaints received concerning racial profiling.

The Attorney General annually shall report statewide statistics on complaints concerning racial profiling received under this section during a year no later than October 1 of the next year to the Legislative Council.

If the Attorney General suspects that a violation of law has occurred, the Attorney General shall refer the matter to the appropriate prosecuting attorney or other appropriate legal authority.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 768, § 1; 2017, No. 250, § 7.

Subchapter 15

— Arkansas State Criminal Records Act

12-12-1501. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas State Criminal Records Act”.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 1.

12-12-1502. Intent.

It is the intent of this subchapter to:

Provide one (1) source for obtaining the most accurate and complete criminal history information;

Allow dissemination of criminal history information to employers, professional licensing boards, and any entity mandated by Arkansas law to perform background checks through the Department of Arkansas State Police pertaining to all felony arrest information and all conviction information;

With the written consent of the student or prospective student, allow electronic dissemination of criminal history information to an institution of higher education for a student enrolled in, and a prospective student seeking enrollment in, a medical, nursing, pharmacy, or other health-related course of study at an institution of higher education located in Arkansas;

Allow dissemination of criminal history information to the Arkansas Public Defender Commission for use in defense of criminal defendants. Expunged and sealed criminal history information shall be released to the commission only for the purposes of use for impeachment of witnesses; and

Allow dissemination of criminal history information to the public upon proper request and payment without requiring the written consent of the subject of the request.

The department shall be the agency responsible for the dissemination of criminal history information under this subchapter.

The Arkansas Crime Information Center may disseminate criminal history information as authorized by law.

Felony arrest information that has had a disposition of acquittal, dismissal, or nolle prosequi entered into the central repository shall not be released under this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment by No. 1573 inserted “and any entity mandated by Arkansas law to perform background checks through the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(2).

The 2005 amendment by No. 2213 added (a)(3).

The 2007 amendment added (a)(4), and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment added (a)(5).

Cross References. Arkansas Crime Information Center Supervisory Board, duties and responsibilities, §12-12-203.

Department of Arkansas State Police, duties, powers, restrictions, municipal police barred from certain highways, §12-8-106.

Registration, certification, and licensing for criminal offenders, §17-1-103.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 2; 2005, No. 1573, § 2; 2005, No. 2213, § 2; 2007, No. 1586, § 1; 2015, No. 1185, § 1.

12-12-1503. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Administration of criminal justice” means performing functions of investigation, apprehension, detention, prosecution, adjudication, correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders, including criminal identification activities and the collection, maintenance, and dissemination of criminal justice information;

“Arrest records” or “arrest information” means felony arrest information in which conviction or disposition information has not been entered into the central repository.

“Arrest records” or “arrest information” does not include:

Misdemeanor arrest information;

Felony arrest information that has a disposition of acquittal, dismissal, or nolle prosequi entered into the central repository; or

Felony arrest information if more than three (3) years have elapsed from the date of the felony arrest;

“Bureau” means the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police, which may maintain fingerprint card files and other identification information on individuals;

“Central repository” means the Arkansas Crime Information Center, which collects, maintains, and disseminates criminal history information;

“Conviction information” means criminal history information disclosing that a person has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or was found guilty of a criminal offense in a court of law, together with sentencing information.

“Conviction information” does not include a sealed or expunged record;

“Criminal history information” means a record compiled by the central repository or the bureau on an individual consisting of names, identification data, notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, informations, or other formal criminal charges obtained from criminal justice agencies, including any dispositions of the charges, as well as notations on correctional supervision and release.

“Criminal history information” does not include the following:

Fingerprint records on individuals not involved in the criminal justice system, juvenile records, or driver history records;

Original records of entry maintained by criminal justice agencies, court indices, records of public judicial proceedings, court decisions, opinions, and information disclosed during public judicial proceedings; and

Records when the release is made by the specific court, law enforcement agency, or prosecutor that created the records.

This subdivision (6) does not prohibit the release of information by the specific agency that created the record;

“Criminal justice agency” means a government agency or any subunit thereof that is authorized by law to perform the administration of criminal justice and that allocates more than one-half (1/2) of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice;

“Disposition” means information describing the outcome of any criminal charges, including notations that law enforcement officials have elected not to refer the matter to a prosecutor, that a prosecutor has elected not to begin criminal proceedings, or that proceedings have been indefinitely postponed.

“Disposition” includes acquittals, dismissals, probations, charges pending due to mental disease or defect, guilty pleas, nolle prosequi, nolo contendere pleas, findings of guilt, youthful offender determinations, first offender programs, pardons, commuted sentences, mistrials in which the defendant is discharged, executive clemencies, paroles, releases from correctional supervision, deaths, or a finding that the person must register as a sex offender;

“Dissemination” means disclosing criminal history information or disclosing the absence of criminal history information to any requestor that has applied and been approved by the Department of Arkansas State Police to receive the criminal history information.

“Dissemination” does not mean:

The furnishing of information by a department to personnel of a participating agency when criminal justice agencies jointly participate in the maintenance of a single recordkeeping system as an alternative to maintaining separate records; and

The furnishing of information by any criminal justice agency to another for the purpose of the administration of criminal justice;

“Employer” means a person or an entity that employs the services of another person or for whom an employee works and receives payment of wages or salary.

“Employer” includes a person acting on an employer's behalf;

“Pending information” means felony criminal history information in some stage of active prosecution or processing;

“Requestor” means:

The employer, professional licensing board, institution of higher education, Arkansas Public Defender Commission, or any entity mandated or authorized by Arkansas law to perform criminal background checks through the department or any person who has obtained the written authorization of the subject of the record that has submitted an inquiry into an individual's criminal history information under this subchapter; or

A person who has submitted an inquiry into an individual's criminal history information under § 12-12-1506(d); and

“Seal” or “expunge” means that the record or records in question shall be sealed, sequestered, and treated as confidential as provided by law, including pardons issued by the Governor.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 571, § 1, provided:

“Legislative intent. It is the intent of this act to allow the Department of Arkansas State Police to release certain criminal history information to persons performing background checks on behalf of an employer and persons who have the written consent of the subject.”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment by No. 1573 substituted “requestor” for “agency, professional licensing board, business designated by state or federal law, or any other employer legally doing business in and paying taxes to the State of Arkansas” in (9)(A); substituted “employer, professional licensing board” for “employer, or professional licensing board” in (11); and made minor punctuation changes.

The 2005 amendment by No. 2213 substituted “requestor” for “agency, professional licensing board, business designated by state or federal law, or any other employer legally doing business in and paying taxes to the State of Arkansas” in (9)(A).

The 2007 amendment by No. 59 added (2)(B)(iii); inserted the designations of (i) and (ii) in former (2)(B), and made related changes.

The 2007 amendment by No. 571 inserted present (10) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and inserted “or any person who has obtained the written authorization of the subject of the record” in (12).

The 2007 amendment by No. 1586 inserted “Arkansas Public Defender Commission” in present (12), and made a related change.

The 2015 amendment added designation (12)(A); inserted “or authorized” in (12)(A); and added (12)(B).

Cross References. Registration, certification, and licensing for criminal offenders, §17-1-103.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 3; 2005, No. 1573, § 3; 2005, No. 2213, §§ 3, 4; 2007, No. 59, § 2; 2007, No. 571, § 2; 2007, No. 1586, § 2; 2015, No. 1185, § 2.

12-12-1504. Information required — Exceptions.

The Department of Arkansas State Police and the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall disseminate criminal history information pertaining to any felony arrest, detention, indictment, information, or other formal felony criminal charge to the extent entries have been made at the time of the request for the criminal history information.

Any event, activity, or any portion of the criminal history information which has not been processed by the department or the center shall not be required to be included in the dissemination.

Requests for information, supporting documents, and any responses under this subchapter are not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

This subchapter shall not affect any record or information that may be accessed by the public under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

Cross References. Arkansas Crime Information Center Supervisory Board, duties and responsibilities, §12-12-203.

Department of Arkansas State Police, duties, powers, restrictions, municipal police barred from certain highways, §12-8-106.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment by No. 1573, in (a)(4)(A)(i), substituted “requestor” for “employer or professional licensing board,” inserted “for at least three (3) years”; and substituted “requestor” for “employer or professional licensing board” in (4)(A)(ii).

The 2005 amendment by No. 2213, in (a)(4)(A)(i), substituted “requestor” for “employer or professional licensing board” inserted “for at least three (3) years,” an added “student or prospective student”; and substituted “requestor” for “emoployer or professional licensing board” in (4)(A)(ii).

The 2007 amendment inserted (a)(4)(A)(ii), and redesignated former (ii) as present (iii).

The 2015 amendment inserted “during” in (a)(2); rewrote (a)(4)(A)(i); in (a)(4)(B), inserted “any written”, substituted “documents” for “forms”, and added “or the center” to the end; and added (d).

Cross References. Arkansas Crime Information Center Supervisory Board, duties and responsibilities, §12-12-203.

Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police, §12-12-1005.

Registration, certification, and licensing for criminal offenders, §17-1-103.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added (c).

The 2009 amendment added (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, throughout the section, substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” and “division” for “department”.

Cross References. Arkansas Crime Information Center Supervisory Board, duties and responsibilities, §12-12-203.

Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police, §12-12-1005.

Thirty-eight percent (38%) as special revenues to the State Police Equipment Fund, which may be utilized for the automated fingerprint identification system, and includes components and software to support a total integrated solution associated with the system;

Thirty-eight percent (38%) as special revenues to the Crime Information System Fund, which may be used for the operation or expansion of the automated criminal justice information system; and

Twenty-four percent (24%) to the Crime Victims Reparations Revolving Fund.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section” at the beginning of (a)(1); and added (c).

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 4.

12-12-1505. Disposition of data to the central repository.

Criminal history information shall be submitted to the Arkansas Crime Information Center as required under §12-12-1007.

The central repository shall enter these disposition records in an expeditious manner.

Criminal history information provided to the central repository or the Department of Arkansas State Police shall not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 5.

12-12-1506. Unrestricted information — Records — Immunity from civil liability.

(1)All conviction information and felony arrest records may be disseminated as provided in this subchapter.

Any criminal history information of felony arrest records and all conviction information that pertains to a person currently being processed by the criminal justice system, including during the entire period of correctional supervision extending through final discharge from parole, may be disseminated without restriction.

(A)The Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police, the Arkansas Crime Information Center, or a third party shall be responsible for the maintenance of information pertaining to dissemination of criminal history information.

The information pertaining to dissemination required to be maintained shall be retained for a period of not less than three (3) years for security purposes.

(A)(i)Each requestor that is allowed access to criminal history information under this subchapter with written consent of the subject of the request shall maintain the written consent document in its files for at least three (3) years.

Access to criminal history information and sealed or expunged records for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission is authorized without the consent of the subject of the request. However, the commission shall maintain records of the reason the dissemination was requested for a period of three (3) years.

Any requestor that is granted access to criminal history information under this subchapter shall not disseminate the criminal history information.

These files and any written consent documents shall be subject to inspection by the Department of Arkansas State Police or the center.

This section allows the dissemination of information concerning persons who are required to register as sex offenders.

A criminal justice agency and its employees and officials shall be immune from civil liability except in instances of gross negligence or intentional malice for dissemination of criminal history information under this subchapter.

The department shall provide criminal history information to any person upon proper request and payment of the requisite fee and without requiring written consent of the subject of the request.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 6; 2005, No. 1573, § 4; 2005, No. 2213, § 5; 2007, No. 1586, § 3; 2015, No. 1185, § 3.

12-12-1507. Administration.

(1)Release of criminal history information under this subchapter shall be made only by the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police and the Arkansas Crime Information Center as authorized by law.

The Division of Arkansas State Police and the center may adopt rules consistent with the provisions and intent of this subchapter.

The division and the center may contract with the Information Network of Arkansas under the Information Network of Arkansas Act, §25-27-101 et seq., or any other qualified third-party vendor in the establishment of the gateway or means of electronically processing transactions under this subchapter.

(1)The division shall not process a request for a Federal Bureau of Investigation background check unless a corresponding state background check through the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police has also been properly requested pursuant to this subchapter.

The requirements of subdivision (c)(1) of this section may be waived upon written authorization of the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

The Division of Arkansas State Police Automated Fingerprint Identification System may access and use the National Fingerprint File and Interstate Identification Index as provided by the Federal Bureau of Investigation when the Arkansas Code authorizes a fingerprint-based Federal Bureau of Investigation check for a noncriminal justice purpose and a positive identification based on fingerprints is made.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 7; 2005, No. 1573, § 5; 2009, No. 168, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 870; 2019, No. 910, §
5858.

12-12-1508. Access to information — Fee.

Criminal history information or requestor information collected and maintained under this subchapter is not considered public record information for dissemination within the intent and meaning of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

A fee for providing criminal history information shall be charged for each criminal history information requested.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 8.

12-12-1509. Right of review and challenge.

(1)A person may review and challenge his or her criminal history information under §12-12-1013.

No fee shall be charged for the review or challenge of criminal history information.

(1)A person may go to any law enforcement agency, provide positive verification of his or her identity, be fingerprinted by the law enforcement agency, and supply written details of the errors in the criminal history information.

The local law enforcement agency must send the fingerprint card and information directly to the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police.

The law enforcement agency shall verify that the identification of the person and the fingerprint card information are correct.

There shall be no charge from the Department of Arkansas State Police or the Arkansas Crime Information Center for this review process.

(1)After positive identification verification, a person may review his or her requestor information maintained through the department or its designee.

No fee shall be charged for this review.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 9.

12-12-1510. Fees.

(1)Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a fee may be charged for providing criminal history information under this subchapter.

The amount of the fee shall be determined jointly by the Department of Arkansas State Police and the Arkansas Crime Information Center and shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00), exclusive of any third-party electronic processing fee charges.

(A)The fees shall be credited fifty percent (50%) to the Crime Information System Fund and fifty percent (50%) to the State Police Equipment Fund.

The center may utilize these funds for the operation or expansion of the automated criminal justice information system, subject to legislative appropriations.

The department may utilize these funds for the operation, expansion, and integration of the automated fingerprint identification system, which includes components and software to support a total integrated solution associated with the system.

Special revenues deposited into the Crime Information System Fund and the State Police Equipment Fund may be used for personal services and operating expenses as provided by law, and any special revenues unused at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried forward.

Any fee collected pursuant to a release of information under §12-12-1506(d) shall be determined jointly by the department and the center and shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) per request, exclusive of any third-party electronic processing or payment fee charged, and shall be credited as follows:

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 10; 2015, No. 1185, § 4.

12-12-1511. Penalty.

Any person who shall knowingly release or disclose to any unauthorized person any information collected and maintained under this subchapter and any person who knowingly obtains the information for purposes not authorized by this subchapter shall be deemed guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 11.

12-12-1512. Rules.

The Division of Arkansas State Police and the Arkansas Crime Information Center may promulgate rules as are necessary to implement, enforce, and administer this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 63, § 11;
2019, No. 315, § 871.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading and in the text.

Cross References. Arkansas Crime Information Center Supervisory Board, duties and responsibilities, §12-12-203.

Department of Arkansas State Police, duties, powers, restrictions, municipal police barred from certain highways, §12-8-106.